Utah statutes.
35A-8-705.   Corporation as continuation of agency.

The corporation is a continuation of the Utah Housing Finance Agency and shall:

(1)  possess all rights, title, privileges, powers, immunities, property, and claims of the agency; and

(2)  fulfill and perform all obligations of the agency, including all agency obligations relating to outstanding bonds and notes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

